Illinois, session 104th, SB4192.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Program of All-Inclusive Care for the 5Elderly Act is amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 40/15)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6915)7    Sec. 15. Program implementation. 8    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 9prepare and submit a PACE State Plan amendment no later than 10December 31, 2022 to the federal Centers for Medicare and 11Medicaid Services to establish the Program of All-Inclusive 12Care for the Elderly (PACE program) to provide 13community-based, risk-based, and capitated long-term care 14services as optional services under the Illinois Title XIX 15State Plan and under contracts entered into between the 16federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services, and PACE 18organizations, meeting the requirements of the Balanced Budget 19Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and any other applicable law or 20regulation.21    (b) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 22facilitate the PACE organization application process no later 23than December 31, 2023.  SB4192- 2 -LRB104 21496 KTG 36788 b1    (c) All PACE organizations selected shall begin operations 2no later than June 30, 2024.3    (d) Using a risk-based financing model, the organizations 4contracted to implement the PACE program shall assume 5responsibility for all costs generated by the PACE program 6participants, and shall create and maintain a risk reserve 7fund that will cover any cost overages for any participant. 8The PACE program is responsible for the entire range of 9services in the consolidated service model, including hospital 10and nursing home care, according to participant need as 11determined by a multidisciplinary team. The contracted 12organizations are responsible for the full financial risk. 13Specific arrangements of the risk-based financing model shall 14be adopted and negotiated by the federal Centers for Medicare 15and Medicaid Services, the organizations contracted to 16implement the PACE program, and the Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services.18    (e) The requirements of the PACE model, as provided for 19under Section 1894 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395eee) and Section 1934 20(42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-4) of the federal Social Security Act, 21shall not be waived or modified. The requirements that shall 22not be waived or modified include all of the following: 23        (1) The focus on frail elderly qualifying individuals 24    who require the level of care provided in a nursing 25    facility.26        (2) The delivery of comprehensive, integrated acute   SB4192- 3 -LRB104 21496 KTG 36788 b1    and long-term care services.2        (3) The interdisciplinary team approach to care 3    management and service delivery.4        (4) Capitated, integrated financing that allows the 5    provider to pool payments received from public and private 6    programs and individuals.7        (5) The assumption by the provider of full financial 8    risk.9        (6) The provision of a PACE benefit package for all 10    participants, regardless of source of payment, that shall 11    include all of the following: 12            (A) All Medicare-covered items and services.13            (B) All Medicaid-covered items and services, as 14        specified in the Illinois Title XIX State Plan.15            (C) Other services determined necessary by the 16        interdisciplinary team to improve and maintain the 17        participant's overall health status. 18    (f) The provisions under Sections 1-7 and 5-4 of the 19Illinois Public Aid Code and under 80 Ill. Adm. Code 120.379, 20120.380, and 120.385 shall apply when determining the 21eligibility for medical assistance of a person receiving PACE 22services from an organization providing services under this 23Act. 24    (g) Provisions governing the treatment of income and 25resources of a married couple, for the purposes of determining 26the eligibility of a nursing-facility certifiable or   SB4192- 4 -LRB104 21496 KTG 36788 b1institutionalized spouse, shall be established so as to 2qualify for federal financial participation. 3    (h) Notwithstanding subsection (e), and only to the extent 4federal financial participation is available, the Department 5of Healthcare and Family Services, in consultation with PACE 6organizations, may seek increased federal regulatory 7flexibility from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8Services to modernize the PACE program, which may include, but 9is not limited to, addressing all of the following: 10        (A) Composition of PACE interdisciplinary teams.11        (B) Use of community-based physicians.12        (C) Marketing practices.13        (D) Development of a streamlined PACE waiver process.14    This subsection shall be operative upon federal approval 15of a capitation rate methodology as provided under Section 16. 16    (i) Each PACE organization shall provide the Department 17with required reporting documents as set forth in 42 CFR 18460.190 through 42 CFR 460.196. 19    (j) The geographic area consisting of the following zip 20codes in Cook County shall be a designated service area under 21the PACE program: 60610, 60613,60614, 60640, and 60657. 22(Source: P.A. 102-43, eff. 7-6-21.)